North Carolina, session 2025, SB699.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. In conjunction with the requirements of Section 9E.26 of S.L.
2023-134 for the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB),
to explore options available to increase access to Medicaid services for dual eligibles that provide
alternatives to nursing home placements, DHB shall consult with stakeholders and shall submit
to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) a request that meets all of the
following goals:
(1) Provides Medicaid coverage of personal care services to individuals who
reside in licensed adult care homes and special care units and whose income
exceeds the limit for participation in the State-County Special Assistance
Program authorized under G.S. 108A-40, but does not exceed either (i) 180%
of the federal poverty level, for individuals who, but for their income, would
qualify for State-County Special Assistance at the basic rate under
G.S. 108A-42.1 or (ii) 200% of the federal poverty level, for individuals who,
but for their income, would qualify for would qualify for State-County Special
Assistance at the enhanced rate under G.S. 108A-42.1.
(2) Ensures that the cost of any new Medicaid coverage being requested is offset
by savings or cost avoidance.
(3) Ensures compliance with applicable legal requirements.
SECTION 2. DHB shall take any actions necessary to implement this act and shall
submit the appropriate request to CMS within 90 days after this act becomes law. DHB shall only
implement the Medicaid coverage described in the request if (i) the request is approved by CMS,
and (ii) the request meets all of the goals in Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S699-v-1*